Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-147
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Finding adoptive families for children for whom state
assistance is provided pursuant to sections 43-117 to
43-118 and 43-118.02 and assuring the protection of the interests
of the children affected during the entire assistance period require special
measures when the adoptive parents move to other states or are residents of
another state; and

(2) Providing medical and other necessary services for children,
with state assistance, is more difficult when the services are provided in
other states.

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1062, § 4.